Montana, session 2025, SB375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Sale of edible hemp PRODUCT CONTAINING THC TO CONSUMERS prohibited. (1) Unless
authorized as a food or drug by the United States food and drug administration, an edible product containing a
hemp product containing total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) may not be sold to a consumer in the state.
(2) (a) For the purposes of this section, "hemp" means the plant species Cannabis sativa L. and
any part of that plant, including the seeds and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and
salts of isomers, whether growing or not the following definitions apply:
(a) "Consumer" means an individual who is a member of the public, takes possession of the hemp
product, and does not offer the hemp product for resale.
(b) "Hemp" has the same meaning as provided in 80-18-101.
(b) The term does not include synthetic cannabinoids.(c) "Hemp product" means a product that
contains postharvest hemp and that is intended for consumption, smoking, vaping, or another method of
administration.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
50, chapter 31, part 2, and the provisions of Title 50, chapter 31, part 2, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 375
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 375
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 375
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 375, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 375
INTRODUCED BY M. NOLAND
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO THE SALE OF HEMP PRODUCTS TO CONSUMERS; PROHIBITING
THE SALE OF EDIBLE HEMP PRODUCTS THAT CONTAIN THC TO CONSUMERS; PROVIDING A
DEFINITION DEFINITIONS; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”